New York, session 2025-2026, A6187.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 804-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 804-e. Multi-cultural curriculum. 1. All schools including elementa- 4 ry schools, junior high schools and senior high schools shall be 5 required to teach a multi-cultural curriculum which shall be set out in 6 rules and regulations to be promulgated by the commissioner. 7 2. In formulating the rules and regulations for a multi-cultural 8 curriculum the commissioner shall allow for and shall implement rules 9 and regulations which consider the differences in the cultural composi- 10 tion of each school and the commissioner shall allow and direct schools 11 to do research and observation on their own student body in order to 12 particularize multi-cultural education to fit such education to such 13 school. 14 3. The commissioner shall also promulgate rules and regulations which 15 shall set out a teacher education program in order to train teachers and 16 educators to teach and interact with students of different cultural and 17 ethnic backgrounds. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of September next 19 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10182-01-5